Maine, session 132, LD374.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §272, sub-§3, as repealed and replaced by PL 1989, c. 501,
Pt. O, §20, is amended to read:
3. Compensation. The compensation of deputy and assistant district attorneys shall
must be fixed by the district attorney, subject to the approval of the Attorney General and
the Governor. For purposes of compensation and benefits, deputy and assistant district
attorneys shall must be treated comparably to assistant attorneys general and public
defenders. For purposes of this subsection, "public defender" has the same meaning as in
Title 4, section 1802, subsection 5.